Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.35.202

Educational specialist degrees.

The boards of trustees of Central Washington University, Eastern Washington University, and Western Washington University may offer educational specialist degrees.

[ 2013 c 296 s 1; 2012 c 229 s 810; 2011 c 136 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.